District of Columbia statutes.
11-701

Continuation of court; court of record; seal.

(a)

The District of Columbia Court of Appeals (hereafter in this subchapter referred to as the “court”) shall continue as a court of record in the District of Columbia.

(b)

The court shall have a seal.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 478, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Cross References

Continuation of District of Columbia court system, see § 1-207.18.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-701.
1973 Ed., § 11-701.